src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* +Sem/Act Activity
* +Sem/Amount Amount
* +Sem/Ani Animate
* +Sem/Aniprod Animal Product
* +Sem/Body Bodypart
* +Sem/Body-abstr siellu, vuoig?a, jierbmi
* +Sem/Build Building
* +Sem/Build-part Part of Bulding, like the closet
* +Sem/Cat Category
* +Sem/Clth Clothes
* +Sem/Clth-jewl Jewelery
* +Sem/Clth-part part of clothes, boallu, sávdnji...
* +Sem/Ctain Container
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr Abstract container like bank account
* +Sem/Ctain-clth
* +Sem/Curr Currency like dollár, Not Money
* +Sem/Dance Dance
* +Sem/Dir Direction like GPS-kursa
* +Sem/Domain Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions)
* +Sem/Drink Drink
* +Sem/Dummytag Dummytag
* +Sem/Edu Educational event
* +Sem/Event Event
* +Sem/Feat Feature, like Árvu
* +Sem/Feat-phys Physiological feature, ivdni, fárda
* +Sem/Feat-psych Psychological feauture
* +Sem/Feat-measr Psychological feauture
* +Sem/Fem Female name
* +Sem/Food Food
* +Sem/Food-med Medicine
* +Sem/Furn Furniture
* +Sem/Game Game
* +Sem/Geom Geometrical object
* +Sem/Group Animal or Human Group
* +Sem/Hum Human
* +Sem/Hum-abstr Human abstract
* +Sem/Ideol Ideology
* +Sem/Kin Kinship term (special PxSg2 forms),
* +Sem/Kin_Fem Kinship term (special PxSg2 forms), female
* +Sem/Kin_Mal Kinship term (special PxSg2 forms), male
* +Sem/Lang Language
* +Sem/Mal Male name
* +Sem/Mat Material for producing things
* +Sem/Measr Measure
* +Sem/Money Has to do with money, like wages, not Curr(ency)
* +Sem/Obj Object
* +Sem/Obj-clo Cloth
* +Sem/Obj-cogn Cloth
* +Sem/Obj-el (Electrical) machine or apparatus
* +Sem/Obj-ling Object with something written on it
* +Sem/Obj-rope flexible ropelike object
* +Sem/Obj-surfc Surface object
* +Sem/Org Organisation
* +Sem/Part Feature, oassi, bealli
* +Sem/Perc-cogn Cognative perception
* +Sem/Perc-emo Emotional perception
* +Sem/Perc-phys Physical perception
* +Sem/Perc-psych Physical perception
* +Sem/Plant Plant
* +Sem/Plant-part Plant part
* +Sem/Plc Place
* +Sem/Plc-abstr Abstract place
* +Sem/Plc-elevate Place
* +Sem/Plc-line Place
* +Sem/Plc-water Place
* +Sem/Pos Position (as in social position job)
* +Sem/Process Process
* +Sem/Prod Product
* +Sem/Prod-audio Audio product
* +Sem/Prod-cogn Cognition product
* +Sem/Prod-ling Linguistic product
* +Sem/Prod-vis Visual product
* +Sem/Rel Relation
* +Sem/Route Name of a Route
* +Sem/Rule Rule or convention
* +Sem/Semcon Semantic concept
* +Sem/Sign Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation) 
* +Sem/Sport Sport
* +Sem/State 
* +Sem/State-sick Illness
* +Sem/Substnc Substance, like Air and Water
* +Sem/Sur Surname
* +Sem/Fem-Sur Surname female
* +Sem/Mal-Sur Surname male
* +Sem/Symbol Symbol
* +Sem/Time Time
* +Sem/Tool Prototypical tool for repairing things
* +Sem/Tool-catch Tool used for catching (e.g. fish)
* +Sem/Tool-clean Tool used for cleaning
* +Sem/Tool-it Tool used in IT
* +Sem/Tool-measr Tool used for measuring
* +Sem/Tool-music Music instrument
* +Sem/Tool-write Writing tool
* +Sem/Txt Text (girji, lávlla...)
* +Sem/Veh Vehicle
* +Sem/Wpn Weapon
* +Sem/Wthr The Weather or the state of ground

Multiple Semantic tags:
* +Sem/Act_Group 
* +Sem/Act_Plc 
* +Sem/Act_Route 
* +Sem/Amount_Build 
* +Sem/Amount_Semcon 
* +Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum 
* +Sem/Ani_Build 
* +Sem/Ani_Build-part 
* +Sem/Ani_Build_Hum_Txt 
* +Sem/Ani_Group 
* +Sem/Ani_Group_Hum 
* +Sem/Ani_Hum 
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Plc 
* +Sem/Ani_Hum_Time 
* +Sem/Ani_Plc 
* +Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt 
* +Sem/Ani_Time 
* +Sem/Ani_Veh 
* +Sem/Aniprod_Hum 
* +Sem/Aniprod_Obj-clo 
* +Sem/Aniprod_Perc-phys 
* +Sem/Aniprod_Plc 
* +Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon 
* +Sem/Body_Body-abstr 
* +Sem/Body_Clth 
* +Sem/Body_Food 
* +Sem/Body_Group_Hum 
* +Sem/Body_Hum 
* +Sem/Body_Mat 
* +Sem/Body_Measr 
* +Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch 
* +Sem/Body_Plc 
* +Sem/Body_Time 
* +Sem/Build-part_Plc 
* +Sem/Build_Build-part 
* +Sem/Build_Clth-part 
* +Sem/Build_Edu_Org 
* +Sem/Build_Event_Org 
* +Sem/Build_Org 
* +Sem/Build_Route 
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr 
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Money 
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Plant 
* +Sem/Clth_Hum 
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org 
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant 
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh 
* +Sem/Ctain_Feat-phys 
* +Sem/Ctain_Furn 
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool 
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool-measr 
* +Sem/Curr_Org 
* +Sem/Dance_Org 
* +Sem/Dance_Prod-audio 
* +Sem/Domain_Food-med 
* +Sem/Domain_Prod-audio 
* +Sem/Edu_Event 
* +Sem/Edu_Group_Hum 
* +Sem/Edu_Mat 
* +Sem/Edu_Org 
* +Sem/Event_Food 
* +Sem/Event_Hum 
* +Sem/Event_Plc 
* +Sem/Event_Time 
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write 
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Veh 
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Wthr 
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Hum 
* +Sem/Feat_Plant 
* +Sem/Food_Perc-phys 
* +Sem/Food_Plant 
* +Sem/Game_Obj-play 
* +Sem/Geom_Obj 
* +Sem/Group_Hum 
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Org 
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc 
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Prod-vis 
* +Sem/Group_Org 
* +Sem/Group_Sign 
* +Sem/Group_Txt 
* +Sem/Hum_Lang 
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc 
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Time 
* +Sem/Hum_Obj 
* +Sem/Hum_Org 
* +Sem/Hum_Plant 
* +Sem/Hum_Plc 
* +Sem/Hum_Tool 
* +Sem/Hum_Veh 
* +Sem/Hum_Wthr 
* +Sem/Lang_Tool 
* +Sem/Mat_Plant 
* +Sem/Mat_Txt 
* +Sem/Measr_Time 
* +Sem/Money_Obj 
* +Sem/Money_Txt 
* +Sem/Obj-play 
* +Sem/Obj-play_Sport 
* +Sem/Obj_Semcon 
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Org 
* +Sem/Org_Rule 
* +Sem/Org_Txt 
* +Sem/Org_Veh 
* +Sem/Part_Prod-cogn 
* +Sem/Perc-emo_Wthr 
* +Sem/Plant_Plant-part 
* +Sem/Plant_Tool 
* +Sem/Plant_Tool-measr 
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Rel_State 
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Route 
* +Sem/Plc_Pos 
* +Sem/Plc_Route 
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc 
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr 
* +Sem/Plc_Time 
* +Sem/Plc_Tool-catch 
* +Sem/Plc_Wthr 
* +Sem/Prod-audio_Txt 
* +Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt 
* +Sem/Semcon_Txt 
* +Sem/Obj_State 
* +Sem/Substnc_Wthr 
* +Sem/Time_Wthr 

Semantics are classified with
* +Sem/Divinity  Divinity (god personified),
* +Sem/Constellation  Constellation,
* +Sem/Ant  Anthroponym
* +Sem/Fem  Anthroponym female
* +Sem/Mal  Anthroponym male
* +Sem/Patr  Patronym
* +Sem/Fem-Patr  Patronym female
* +Sem/Mal-Patr  Patronym male
* +Sem/Rvr  name of river or water way, media of transportation,
* +Sem/Mnth  name of month
* +Sem/Inanim  Inanimate,

Semantic Fields
* +Field/Agr agriculatural
* +Field/Anat anatomical
* +Field/Bio biological
* +Field/Bot botanical
* +Field/Chem chemical
* +Field/Geol geological
* +Field/Gram grammatical
* +Field/Hist historical
* +Field/Law law
* +Field/Mar maritime
* +Field/Math mathematical
* +Field/Med medical
* +Field/Mus musical
* +Field/Relig church
* +Field/Tech technical
* +Field/Zool zoological

# Other tags

## Verbal arguments
* +Subj/Zero This is used to mark verbs without a semantic subject

Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
source and target part-of-speech.

* +V→N +V→V +V→A 

## Homonymy

## Der begin
* +Der  In front of every derivation to make it
possible to target derivations as a class e.g. in regular expressions etc
* +Der/VtOmO
* +Der/AbeAttr
* +Der/stO Deriving adverbs from adjectives A2Adv
* +Der/ms эрзямс эрзя, истямс истя, вадрямс вадря
* +Der/shka 
* +Der/GenAttr +Der/Onj genitive attribute derivation of non-nouns
* +Der/aj vocative
* +Der/kaj vocative
* +Der/PatrMal Male patronymic
* +Der/PatrFem Female patronymic

* +Der/Ovt * telic deverbal noun also attr, resultative participle
* +Der/Oms * infinitive illative
* +Der/OmO * infinitive locative/nominative
* +Der/OmstO * infinitive elative
* +Der/OmsO * infinitive inessive
* +Der/OmdO * infinitive ablative
* +Der/Omga * infinitive prolative
* +Der/Oma * modality: deontic/directive/obligative андомс: андома , якамс: якама
* +Der/Omka * modality: deontic/directive/obligative андомс: андомка , якамс: якамка
* +Der/Ycja * active (demonstrative) present participle  takes copula person
* +Der/Yj * active long present participle takes copula person
* +Der/Y * active short present participle
* +Der/Yks * active short present participle with ks derivation
* +Der/Ozj * Gerund
* +Der/Cond * conditional derivation +Der/Ynderja
* +Der/NomAg Actor Noun From Verb - Nomen Agentis (derivation) default in Ыця
* +Der/NomAct Action Noun From Verb - Nomen Actio (derivation)

## Declaring noun derivations
* +Der/pelj 

Modifier without noun
* +Der/MWN Modifier without Noun
* +Der/Dem Speaker-Oriented Demonstrative
## Conjugation of words other than finite verbs
* +Der/Pr derivation to predicate head, e.g. nominal conjugation
* +Der/Cop This is not a derivation
* +Clt/Cop This will replace the nominal conjugation Der/Pr+V
* +Clt/Cond 

## Declaring Indefinite Pronoun derivations
* +Der/koj prefix `+Indef` in indefinite pronouns
* +Der/ta prefix `+Indef` in indefinite pronouns
* +Der/tago prefix `+Indef` in indefinite pronouns
* +Der/Gak suffix `+Indef` in indefinite pronouns
* +Der/buti suffix `+Indef` in indefinite pronouns
* +Der/Yja suffix `+Indef` in indefinite pronouns  ковия, зярыя

## DECLARING NOUN DERIVATIONS
* +Der/chi  adjective-to-noun
## the combinatory --Event-- preceding the NP-final noun
* +Der/OmA  verb-to-noun

## DECLARING NUMERAL DERIVATIONS
* +Der/cje  +A+Ord
* +Der/tjks  +A+Ord (non-contrastive)

## DECLARING DEVERBAL DERIVATIONS OF VERBS
* +Der/kshnO  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OkshnOms  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OvOms  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OvkshnOms  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/OvtOms  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/Ovtnjems  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/Ozevems  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/Ozevtems  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/Ozevtnjems  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/Ozevkshnems  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/sje  this in verb2verb derivation and also in denominal demonstrative --Der/Dem--
* +Der/nje  verb2verb derivation
* +Der/njems  verb2verb derivation

* +Der/Oncje old orth кудонцесь

* +Der/Dimin 
* +Der/ka  diminutive
* +Der/NJE  This is used in ошке, калнэ and кудыне
* +Der/nJE  diminutive
* +Der/Ynje  diminutive
* +Der/Ynjka  diminutive
* +Der/Ynjkinje  diminutive
* +Der/ke  diminutive in --ке--
* +Der/kinje  diminutive
* +Der/ks Adv›N

* +OLang/SME - North Sámi
* +OLang/SMJ - Lule Sámi
* +OLang/SMA - South Sámi
* +OLang/FIN - Finnish
* +OLang/SWE - Swedish
* +OLang/NOB - Norw. bokmål
* +OLang/NNO - Norw. nynorsk
* +OLang/ENG - English
* +OLang/MYV - Erzya
* +OLang/MDF - Moksha
* +OLang/RUS - Russian
* +OLang/TAT - Tatar
* +OLang/UND - Undefined

* +F - Foreign

# Morphophonology

To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
symbols in the lexicon files:

And following triggers to control variation
*  %{frontHard%}    — front harmony hard
*  %{frontSoft%}    — front harmony soft
*  %{back%}    — back harmony
*  %{backHard%}    — back harmony
*  %{dialM%}    — for Shoksha and Drakino Dial/M morphology
*  %{ichPat%}   — for triggering colloquial partonymic forms

* %^CnsRM       — Remove consonant

* Е3 testing тне тнэ
* _%^H_ used with stems in ч, ш, ж for hard plurals

## Special letters in the root	  that might be useful in	dialect	research and etymology later
* Ь3   арсемс:арсе  arśems  vs арсемс:арЬ3се  aŕśems 
* Ӓ3   эрямс:Ӓ3ря
* Ӓ4   пелемс:пӒ4ль

* %^Ӓ3   ^Ӓ3 :Э
* %^Ӓ4   ^Ӓ4 :Е
* %^ӓ3   эрямс:^ӓ3ря
* %^ӓ4   пелемс:п^ӓ4ль

* %^Ь2ZERO   removes stem-final soft sign

* _%{дт%}_ in ablative

* %{ое%} inflectional suffix protovowel  аволь аволинь
* %{оеэØ%} Suffix-initial archiphoneme
* %{уиыØ%} Suffix-initial archiphoneme in dialect
* %^RegrRaise идиса, идима ! raising e:i, o:u before a in NW
* %^Break  ашоян disallow о:

вт%{оеэ%}мО1 suffix-internal archivowel
* %{оэØ%} inessive, elative; this is the hard/broad s
* %{ОØ%} Stem-final archiphoneme панго
* %{ЕØ%} Stem-final archiphoneme тинге

%^OldAE	 — This allows Ӓ4 and Ӓ3 to be realized as я 
* %^NoLinkVow  — No linking vowel is used only after consonants for error
* %^SoftRetain  — The soft sign is not lost when adding -тне
* %^HardNoDent  — Hard non-dent followed by -тнэ потоктнэсэ

# MISC
* +Cmp/Hyph A tag to indicate that a hyphen was used when compounding

Development tag
* +WORK 

* +NoVowX 

* ZERO 
* %0 

* %- 

* +Dig1 
* +Dig2 
* +Dig3 
* +Dig4 
* +Rom Roman numerals
